New York, session 2025-2026, A3595.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of education is hereby authorized and 2 directed to conduct a study on the number of children who are caregivers 3 and how being a caregiver impacts the child's education. "Caregiver 4 children" shall be defined as students with sick, disabled, or elderly 5 relatives that such students care for outside of school and students who 6 provide for the daily care or supervision of a minor child. The commis- 7 sioner of education shall give recommendations based on the study's 8 findings. Such study shall include, but not be limited to: 9 (a) the number of caregiver children within the state; 10 (b) the amount of time caregiver children spend caring for relatives; 11 (c) how being a caregiver child impacts the child's education; 12 (d) the circumstances that lead to a child becoming a caregiver child; 13 and 14 (e) any recommendations on how to reduce the negative educational 15 impacts of being a caregiver child. 16 § 2. Within one year of the effective date of this act, the commis- 17 sioner of education shall submit a report of the commissioner's find- 18 ings, conclusions and recommendations to the governor, the temporary 19 president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, and the chairs of 20 the senate and assembly committees on education. Such report shall also 21 include such legislative proposals as such commissioner deems necessary 22 to implement the recommendations. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07246-03-5